src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
akoin:akoin A_IS-N-PL-GEN  "akkamainen" ;
alembi:alemb A_PAREMBI  "alempi" ;
bohattu:bohatta A_AKKU  "rikas" ;
harmuapiä:harmua#piä A_PIÄ  "harmaapää" ;
hebožien:hebožien A_IS-N-PL-GEN  "hevos-" ;
hurai:hura A_PIIRAI  "vasen" ;
hyvä:hyvä A_HYVÄ  "hyvä" ;
hämär:hämärä A_KALA  "hämärä" ;
imely:imelä A_PÄIVY  "äitelä" ;
jiännös:jiännökse A_ALUS  "loppu-" ;
kaiken% muailman:kaiken% muailman A_EX  "maailmanlaajuinen" ;
kaikki:kaikk A_JÄLGI  "kaikki" ;
kalie:kalie A_HARDIE  "kolea" ;
kauniš:kaune A_RAIŠ  "kaunis" ;
keksevä:keksevä A_OZA  "kekseliäs" ;
kirakko:kirakko A_RUNO  "hauras" ;
kirjuttamatoi:kirjuttamat A_HUOLETOI  "kirjoittamaton" ;
koiran-:koiran- A_IS-N-SG-GEN  "koiran" ;
korgeirovulline:korgei#rovulli A_NAINE  "ylhäissyntyinen" ;
kuundelii:kuundeli A_PEZII  "kuuliainen" ;
kuurnis:kuurne A_KUURNIS  "kuuro" ;
kučuttu:kučuttu A_KOIVU  "kutsuttu" ;
kylläine:kyllä A_LIYGILÄINE  "kylläinen" ;
lagei:lage A_VALGEI  "lakea" ;
laihtunuh:laihtunu A_PESSYH  "laihtunut" ;
leiväkäs:leiväkäs A_ARMAS  "viljava" ;
liedžuju:liedžuja A_MUARJU  "notkuva" ;
lievy:lievä A_KOIRU  "lievä" ;
liikkui:liikku A_OSTAI  "liikkuva" ;
ložie:ložie A_HARDIE  "lihava" ;
lähin:lähi A_ENIN  "lähin" ;
lähys:lähy A_PUHTAHUS  "läheisyys" ;
lämmin:lämbi A_LÄMMIN  "lämmin" ;
madal:madal A_KARJAL  "matala" ;
mielehine:mielehi A_KIELINE  "mieleinen" ;
mielivigaine:mieliviga A_KARJALAINE  "mielenvikainen" ;
moittittav:moittittava A_TAIGIN  "moitittava" ;
monenmoizet:monen#mo A_TOINE-PL  "monenmoiset" ;
muadunnun:muadunnun A_UNDECL  "kurja (itseni, itkuvirsissä)" ;
muamon:muamon A_IS-N-SG-GEN  "äidin" ;
muu:muu A_KUU  "muu" ;
muureh:muureh A_PEREH  "kuivettunut" ;
mygyri:mygyri A_ARTELI  "kupera" ;
nimetöi:nimet A_JIÄTÖI  "nimetön" ;
nuorembi:nuoremb A_PAREMBI  "nuorempi" ;
näiviš:näive A_RAIŠ  "näivettynyt" ;
nämä:nämä A-DEM_NÄMÄ  "nämä" ;
nämä:nämmä A-DEM_NÄMÄ  "nämä" ;
ohottu:ohotta A_AKKU  "innokas" ;
oma:oma A_OZA  "oma" ;
ondo:ondo A_RUADO  "ontto" ;
opastamatoi:opastamat A_HUOLETOI  "oppimaton" ;
paha:paha A_KALA  "paha" ;
pahaččaine:pahačča A_  "" ;
paranii:parani A_PEZII  "toipuva" ;
pimiehkö:pimiehkö A_RUNO  "melko pimeä" ;
polletettu:polletettu A_KOIVU  "tallottu" ;
pädöy:pädö A_KESTÄY  "tarpeellinen" ;
pörhöpiä:pörhöpiä A_BAHUV  "pörröpää" ;
rahmannoi:rahmannoi A_RAHMANNOI  "vieraanvarainen" ;
riidakas:riidakka A_ARMAS  "riitaisa" ;
ruadai:ruada A_OSTAI  "työtätekevä" ;
räkki:räkki A_HÄKKI  "helteinen" ;
silei:sile A_VALGEI  "sileä" ;
sinisilmäine:sinisilmä A_LIYGILÄINE  "sinisilmäinen (silmien väristä)" ;
sundo:sundo A_RUADO  "haalea" ;
suuri:suur A_KIELI  "iso" ;
sydäin:sydäime A_SALBOIN  "(yougi:) sydämellinen" ;
syömäri:syömäri A_ARTELI  "ahne" ;
takouskoi:takouskoi A_RAHMANNOI  "kelvollinen" ;
tervehyöhoijolline:tervehyö#hoijolli A_NAINE  "(yougi:) terveydenhoidollinen" ;
toine:to A_TOINE  "toinen" ;
toižen% suurut:toižen% suuru A_OLUT  "erisuuruinen" ;
torha:torha A_KOIRU  "suorapuheinen" ;
tozi:tod A_VEZI  "tosi" ;
tulii:tuli A_KONDII  "tuleva" ;
tullut:tullu A_TULLUT  "(yougi:) tulokas" ;
tumeh:tumeh A_PEREH  "ummehtunut" ;
tuores:tuore A_TUORES  "tuore" ;
tyyni:tyyn A_NIMI  "tyyni" ;
täyzi:täyd A_VUOZI  "täysi" ;
ubouuzi:ubo#uud A_VUOZI  "upouusi" ;
umbimärgy:umbi#märgä A_PÄIVY  "läpimärkä" ;
umbimärgä:umbi#märgä A_SÄYNÄ  "(yougi:) läpimärkä" ;
urai:ura A_PIIRAI  "järjetön" ;
uskomattoman% suuri:uskomattoman% suure A_KIELI  "uskomattoman suuri" ;
vahnennuh:vahnennu A_PESSYH  "vanhennut" ;
vahnin:vahni A_ENIN  "vanhin" ;
vaivaine:vaiva A_KARJALAINE  "vaivainen" ;
vakki:vakki A_UNDECL  "outo" ;
vallaspidäy:vallaspidä A_KESTÄY  "käskevä" ;
valmis:valme A_KUURNIS  "valmis" ;
važen:važe A_VAŽEN  "vasen" ;
veres:veres A_TUORES  "veres" ;
verikynzi:verikynzi A_BAHUV  "saita" ;
vezine:vezi A_KIELINE  "vetinen" ;
vikkel:vikkelä A_KARJAL  "vikkelä" ;
viäriniekku:viäriniekka A_MUARJU  "syyllinen" ;
väitöi:väit A_JIÄTÖI  "voimaton" ;
yhtenjytyt:yhtenjytty A_OLUT  "(yougi:) yhtäpitävä" ;
yhtenkallehus:yhtenkallehu A_PUHTAHUS  "samanarvoinen" ;
yhtenmoine:yhten#mo A_TOINE  "samanlainen" ;
äimel:äimel A_MADAL  "äitelä" ;
žoltoi:žoltoi A_  "keltainen" ;
